Missouri, session 2026, HB3417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.001, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.001, to read as follows:
478.001. 1. For purposes of sections 478.001 to 478.009, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Adult treatment court", a treatment court focused on addressing the substance use
disorder or co-occurring disorder of defendants charged with a criminal offense;
(2) "Community-based substance use disorder treatment program", an agency
certified by the department of mental health as a substance use disorder treatment provider;
(3) "Co-occurring disorder", the coexistence of both a substance use disorder and a
mental health disorder;
(4) "Domestic violence treatment court", a treatment court focused on
addressing a substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder of defendants charged
with a criminal offense involving domestic violence;
(5) "DWI court", a treatment court focused on addressing the substance use disorder
or co-occurring disorder of defendants who have pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of
driving while intoxicated or driving with excessive blood alcohol content;
[(5)] (6) "Family treatment court", a treatment court focused on addressing a
substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder existing in families in the juvenile court,
family court, or criminal court in which a parent or other household member has been
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3417 2
determined to have a substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder that impacts the safety
and well-being of the children in the family;
[(6)] (7) "Juvenile treatment court", a treatment court focused on addressing the
substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder of juveniles in the juvenile court;
[(7)] (8) "Medication-assisted treatment", the use of pharmacological medications, in
combination with counseling and behavioral therapies, to provide a whole-patient approach to
the treatment of substance use disorders;
[(8)] (9) "Mental health disorder", any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that
has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive, volitional, or emotional function and
that constitutes a substantial impairment in a person's ability to participate in activities of
normal living;
[(9)] (10) "Mental health treatment court", a treatment court focused on addressing
the mental health disorder or co-occurring disorder of defendants charged with a criminal
offense;
[(10)] (11) "Risk and needs assessment", an actuarial tool, approved by the treatment
courts coordinating commission and validated on a targeted population of drug-involved adult
offenders, scientifically proven to determine a person's risk to recidivate and to identify
criminal risk factors that, when properly addressed, can reduce that person's likelihood of
committing future criminal behavior;
[(11)] (12) "Substance use disorder", the recurrent use of alcohol or drugs that causes
clinically significant impairment, including health problems, disability, and failure to meet
major responsibilities at work, school, or home;
[(12)] (13) "Treatment court commissioner", a person appointed by a majority of the
circuit and associate circuit judges in a circuit to preside as the judicial officer in the treatment
court division;
[(13)] (14) "Treatment court division", a specialized, nonadversarial court division
with jurisdiction over cases involving substance-involved offenders and making extensive use
of comprehensive supervision, drug or alcohol testing, and treatment services. Treatment
court divisions include, but are not limited to, the following specialized courts: adult
treatment court, domestic violence treatment court, DWI court, family treatment court,
juvenile treatment court, mental health treatment court, veterans treatment court, or any
combination thereof;
[(14)] (15) "Treatment court team", the following members who are assigned to the
treatment court: the judge or treatment court commissioner, treatment court administrator or
coordinator, prosecutor, public defender or member of the criminal defense bar, a
representative from the division of probation and parole, a representative from law

HB 3417 3
enforcement, substance use disorder or mental health disorder treatment providers, and any
other person selected by the treatment court team;
[(15)] (16) "Veterans treatment court", a treatment court focused on substance use
disorders, co-occurring disorders, or mental health disorders of defendants charged with a
criminal offense who are military veterans or current military personnel.
2. A treatment court division shall be established, prior to August 28, 2021, by any
circuit court pursuant to sections 478.001 to 478.009 to provide an alternative for the judicial
system to dispose of cases which stem from, or are otherwise impacted by, a substance use
disorder or mental health disorder. The treatment court division may include, but not be
limited to, cases assigned to an adult treatment court, domestic violence treatment court,
DWI court, family treatment court, juvenile treatment court, mental health treatment court,
veterans treatment court, or any combination thereof. A treatment court shall combine
judicial supervision, drug or alcohol testing, and treatment of participants. Except for good
cause found by the court, a treatment court making a referral for substance use disorder or
mental health disorder treatment, when such program will receive state or federal funds in
connection with such referral, shall refer the person only to a program which is certified by
the department of mental health, unless no appropriate certified treatment program is located
within the same county as the treatment court. Upon successful completion of the treatment
court program, the charges, petition, or penalty against a treatment court participant may be
dismissed, reduced, or modified, unless otherwise stated. Except for those costs waived
pursuant to section 488.016, any fees received by a court from a defendant as payment for
treatment programs shall not be considered court costs, charges or fines.
3. An adult treatment court may be established by any circuit court to provide an
alternative for the judicial system to dispose of cases which stem from substance use.
4. A DWI court may be established by any circuit court to provide an alternative for
the judicial system to dispose of cases that stem from driving while intoxicated.
5. A family treatment court may be established by any circuit court. The juvenile
division of the circuit court or the family court, if one is established under section 487.010,
may refer one or more parents or other household members subject to its jurisdiction to the
family treatment court if he or she has been determined to have a substance use disorder or
co-occurring disorder that impacts the safety and well-being of the children in the family.
6. A juvenile treatment court may be established by the juvenile division of any
circuit court. The juvenile division may refer a juvenile to the juvenile treatment court if the
juvenile is determined to have committed acts that violate the criminal laws of the state or
ordinances of a municipality or county and a substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder
contributed to the commission of the offense.

HB 3417 4
7. The general assembly finds and declares that it is the public policy of this state to
encourage and provide an alternative method for the disposal of cases for military veterans
and current military personnel with substance use disorders, mental health disorders, or co-
occurring disorders. In order to effectuate this public policy, a veterans treatment court may
be established by any circuit court, or combination of circuit courts upon agreement of the
presiding judges of such circuit courts, to provide an alternative for the judicial system to
dispose of cases that stem from a substance use disorder, mental health disorder, or co-
occurring disorder of military veterans or current military personnel. A veterans treatment
court shall combine judicial supervision, drug or alcohol testing, and substance use and
mental health disorder treatment to participants who have served or are currently serving the
100 United States Armed Forces, including members of the Reserves or National Guard, with
101 preference given to individuals who have combat service. For the purposes of this section,
102 combat service shall be shown through military service documentation that reflects service in
103 a combat theater, receipt of combat service medals, or receipt of imminent danger or hostile
104 fire pay or tax benefits. Except for good cause found by the court, a veterans treatment court
105 shall make a referral for substance use or mental health disorder treatment, or a combination
106 of substance use and mental health disorder treatment, through the Department of Defense
107 health care, the Veterans Administration or its successor department or agency, or a
108 community-based substance use disorder treatment program. Community-based programs
109 utilized shall receive state or federal funds in connection with such referral and shall only
110 refer the individual to a program certified by the department of mental health, unless no
111 appropriate certified treatment program is located within the same circuit as the veterans
112 treatment court.
113 8. A mental health treatment court may be established by any circuit court to provide
114 an alternative for the judicial system to dispose of cases that stem from a mental health
115 disorder or co-occurring disorder.
116 9. A domestic violence treatment court may be established by any circuit court to
117 provide an alternative for the judicial system to dispose of cases that stem from a
118 substance use disorder or co-occurring disorder.
✔